District of Columbia statutes.
32-1518

Compensation as lien against assets.

Any person entitled to compensation under the provisions of this chapter shall have a lien against the assets of the carrier or employer for such compensation without limit of amount, and shall, upon insolvency, bankruptcy, or reorganization in bankruptcy proceedings of the carrier or employer, or both, be entitled to preference and priority in the distribution of the assets of such carrier or employer, or both.

July 1, 1980, D.C. Law 3-77, § 19, 27 DCR 2503

History

This section is referenced in § 32-1519.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 36-318.

Prior Codifications